Vermont, session 2025-2026, H331.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 13 V.S.A. § 5315 is amended to read:
§ 5315. INFORMATION CONCERNING APPEAL OR POST-
CONVICTION POSTCONVICTION REMEDIES
(a) If the defendant appeals or pursues a post-conviction postconviction
remedy, the prosecutor’s office shall promptly inform the victim of a listed
crime of that fact, shall explain the significance of such a proceeding and shall
promptly notify the victim of the date, time, and place of any hearing and of
the decision.
VT LEG #379112 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.331
2025 Page 2 of 2
(b) In cases related to a conviction for a listed crime, in accordance with
court rules, at the hearing the court shall ask if the victim is present and, if so,
whether the victim would like to be heard regarding the matter before the
court. The court shall consider the statements offered at the hearing by the
victim regarding the matter before the court. If the victim is not present, the
court shall ask whether the victim has expressed, either orally or in writing,
views regarding the matter before the court and shall take those views into
consideration.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379112 v.1